California statutes. Public Resources Code
 shall adopt guidelines to determine when to implement the program, including which resources are dispatched first to minimize local pollution and emissions of greenhouse gases. The dispatch order of resources in the program shall follow a loading order that prioritizes, to the maximum extent feasible to ensure electricity reliability, cost-effective demand response and efficiency resources, then feasible, cost-effective renewable and zero-emission resources, and then feasible, cost-effective conventional resources. The guidelines shall also consider the anticipated useful life of the resources in relation to the state’s climate and air quality requirements.

(e) The state board, in consultation with the commission, shall develop a plan, including determining the funding amounts allocated after the dispatch of resources participating in the program, to mitigate impacts from these resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 53, Sec. 6.   (SB 124)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Strategic Reliability Reserve Fund [25793. - 25793.]

25793.

(a) The Strategic Reliability Reserve Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the fund and the accounts contained in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year to be expended by the commission for purposes of adding resources to the electrical grid to ensure electrical grid reliability and support the clean energy transition.

(b) The Distributed Electricity Backup Assets Account is hereby created in the fund, to be administered by the commission to implement the Distributed Electricity Backup Assets Program in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 25791).

(c) The Demand Side Grid
 Support Account is hereby created in the fund, to be administered by the commission to implement the Demand Side Grid Support Program in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 25792). Revenue generated by the sale of energy services within the Demand Side Grid Support Program shall be deposited into the Demand Side Grid Support Account.

(d) The commission may accept nonstate moneys, including, but not limited to, federal moneys, for purposes of this chapter.

(e) The commission shall adopt emergency regulations to implement this chapter at a commission business meeting. Notwithstanding Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, a finding of emergency or necessity to address an emergency shall not be required. Notwithstanding any other law, these emergency regulations shall be valid for three years, or until replaced by nonemergency regulations, whichever is
 sooner.

(f) The executive director, or a designee, of the commission may approve any contract, grant, or loan entered into for purposes of this chapter until October 31, 2023. After October 31, 2023, any contract, grant, or loan entered into for purposes of this chapter shall be approved in a commission meeting held consistent with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 25200). For any contract, grant, or loan entered into for purposes of this chapter, no later than 10 days after the commission, executive director, or their designee, approves the contract, grant, or loan, the executive director of the commission shall give written notice to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the action.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a contract, grant, or loan entered into for purposes of this chapter for an activity that is needed for ensuring electrical grid
 reliability by October 31, 2023, shall not require competitive bidding, or the review, consent, or approval of the Department of General Services or any other state department or agency and is not required to comply with the requirements of the State Contracting Manual, the Public Contract Code, or the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to any contract, grant, or loan entered into for purposes of this chapter that is not needed for ensuring electrical grid reliability by October 31, 2023.

(3) This subdivision is inoperative on November 1, 2023.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission may pay an incentive up front if not doing so would inhibit
 participation in the programs established pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 179.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Certification of Facilities [25794. - 25794.10.]

25794.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources or a person designated by the Department of Water Resources for purposes of this article.

(b) “Facility” means a facility described in Section 80710 of the Water Code.

(c) “Site” means a location on which a facility is constructed or is proposed to be constructed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 6.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25794.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, from October 31, 2022, to October 31, 2026, inclusive, the department shall submit an application for certification to the commission in accordance with this article for a site on which a facility is located.

(b) The issuance of a certificate by the commission for a site and related facility pursuant to this article shall be in lieu of any permit, certificate, or similar document required by any state, local or regional agency, or federal agency to the extent permitted by federal law, for the use of the site and related facility, and shall supersede any applicable statutes, including the California Coastal Act of 1976 (Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000) of this code) and Title 7.2 (commencing with Section 66600) of the
 Government Code, ordinances, regulations, or standards of a state, local, or regional agency, or a federal agency, to the extent permitted by federal law, and shall not be subject to the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) and regulations adopted pursuant to that division.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that this section addresses a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this section applies to all cities, including charter cities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 180.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

25794.2.

(a) The commission shall establish a process to expedite review of an application submitted pursuant to this article. The process shall include guidance to the department on determining optimal locations for facilities based on the potential to improve reliability, reduce the occurrence of public safety power shutoffs, decrease the use of high-emission backup power, minimize air pollution, and avoid impacts on disadvantaged communities, as identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) An application submitted pursuant to this article shall be in the form prescribed by the commission and shall contain all of the information required by Section 25520 and be further supported by other information as the commission may require to enable
 review of the site and related facilities, and issuance of a certification, including, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) A description of the facility, including a showing that it is capable of delivering energy during net peak hours in response to a dispatch by the Independent System Operator during extreme events, and has access to the infrastructure and resources needed to operate.

(2) A description of the site, including surveys to demonstrate the baseline conditions of the site and the site’s zoning designation and the allowable uses within the zoning designation.

(3) A list of all properties and
 property owners within 1,000 feet of the site.

(4) A description of the potential impacts of the project on the environment and on public health and safety, including on the surrounding community, and project design measures proposed to mitigate those potential impacts. The description shall include the applicable local air district’s attainment status under the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7401 et seq.).

(5) A description of all local, state, regional, and federal laws, ordinances, regulations, and standards that would otherwise apply to the facility in the absence of the commission’s exclusive jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 25794.1, and an analysis of the project’s compliance with those local, state, regional, and federal laws, ordinances, regulations, and standards.

(c) An application
 submitted pursuant to this section shall be reviewed by commission staff. The executive director shall prepare a recommendation for the commission’s consideration on whether to issue a certificate for a site and facility pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 16.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25794.3.

Upon receipt of an application pursuant to this article, commission staff shall establish a docket for the proceeding and publish a notice of receipt and shall mail the notice to all property owners within 1,000 feet of the proposed site. The commission shall establish a notification system for interested parties to receive notice of applications filed pursuant to this article. The notice shall also be sent to all local, state, and regional agencies that would have had jurisdiction over the site in the absence of the commission’s exclusive jurisdiction under subdivision (b) of Section 25794.1, federal agencies with jurisdiction over the project, and any California Native American tribe that is traditionally and culturally affiliated with the
 geographic area of the proposed site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 17.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25794.4.

(a) Within 20 days of the submission of the application pursuant to this article, the executive director shall review the application for completeness. The executive director may require the department to submit additional information, documents, or data reasonably necessary to make a decision on the application. The executive director shall transmit the request for additional information within 20 days of the submission of the application.

(b) An application is deemed complete as follows:

(1) Twenty days after the submission of the application, if the executive director does not require the submission of additional information, documents, or data pursuant to subdivision
 (a).

(2) Immediately upon acceptance of the additional information, documents, or data requested by the executive director pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) No later than 180 days after the application is deemed complete, or at any later time as is mutually agreed to by the commission and the department, the commission shall determine whether to issue a certificate for the site and related facility pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 6.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25794.5.

Upon an application being deemed complete, the commission shall do all of the following:

(a) (1) Comply with subdivisions (d) to (g), inclusive, of, and subdivision (k) of, Section 25519.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (f) of Section 25519, local agencies may review an application submitted by the commission under paragraph (1) and may submit comments on, among other things, the design of the facility, architectural and aesthetic features of the facility, access to highways, landscaping and grading, public use of lands in the area of the facility, proximity to sensitive receptors and other incompatible land uses, and other appropriate aspects of the design, construction, or operation of the
 proposed site and related facility.

(b) Provide the application to all California Native American tribes that are culturally and traditionally associated with the geographic area of the site and initiate consultation with those tribes in a manner consistent with Sections 21080.3.1 and 21080.3.2.

(c) (1) If the commission does not receive a California Native American tribe’s request for consultation pursuant to subdivision (b), the commission, within 60 days after the application has been deemed complete, shall complete a preliminary analysis for the facility’s potential impacts to environment and public health and safety and the facility’s compliance with applicable laws, ordinances, regulations, and standards that would have applied in absence of the commission’s exclusive jurisdiction under subdivision (b) of Section 25794.1.

(2) If the commission receives a California Native American tribe’s request for consultation pursuant to subdivision (b), the commission shall complete a preliminary analysis within 30 days after the commission concludes the consultation process with the California Native American tribe pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) Consult with local jurisdictions and state agencies in conducting the analysis to resolve any potential noncompliance with applicable laws, ordinances, regulations, and standards.

(e) Propose conditions and verification and monitoring requirements for
 certification to mitigate any potential impacts to the maximum extent feasible.

(f) Require the department to fully mitigate all air emissions in the surrounding community. The department may use the Climate Heat Impact Response Program (CHIRP) administered by the state board for compliance with this subdivision.

(g) Publish the preliminary analysis for a minimum of 30 days before a 30-day public and agency comment period.

(h) Prepare a final analysis responding to public and agency comments and making any changes at least 10 days before the commission considers whether to approve certification of the site and related facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 18.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25794.6.

The commission shall not certify a site and related facility if any of the following applies:

(a) The site is a site described in Section 25527.

(b) The site has not been previously disturbed, including,
 but not limited to, site clearing, excavating, grading, or other manipulation of the terrain.

(c) The site does not have access to the infrastructure and resources with the necessary existing capacity and in the proximity needed to operate the facility, including, but not limited to, a natural gas line and a water line, as applicable.

(d) After July 31, 2023, the facility will use diesel fuel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 19.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25794.7.

The commission shall maintain on its internet website a list of all certifications granted pursuant to this article for as long as the certifications are in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 6.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25794.8.

(a) A certificate issued pursuant to this article shall be valid for a period not to exceed five years from the date of issuance.

(b) If a facility operates longer than the period specified in subdivision (a), all necessary permits, certificates, or similar documents required by state, local, and federal governments shall first be obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 6.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25794.9.

Sections 25532 to 25537, inclusive, apply to a certificate issued pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 6.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25794.10.

(a) The executive director shall charge and collect a reasonable fee from the department upon the submittal of an application pursuant to this article to cover the estimated actual cost of reviewing an application. The department shall submit a deposit along with the application that does not exceed 3 percent of the estimated capital cost of the proposed facility.

(b) The commission staff shall separately account for the deposit collected and the charges incurred in the review of the application. The status of the account shall be provided to the department at regular intervals established by mutual agreement. The executive director shall request additional deposits if the initial deposit has been exhausted.

(c) A final accounting shall be rendered by the commission staff after the commission has reached a final decision on the application. If, in the final accounting, the deposits exceed the actual costs incurred by the commission, the excess shall be refunded. If the actual costs exceed the amount of the deposits, the department shall be billed for the difference.

(d) The executive director may adjust or waive deposits for minor projects. For facilities with an estimated capital cost that exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000), the executive director shall permit payment of the deposit in increments, as determined by the executive director.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 6.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Miscellaneous [25795. - 25795.5.]

25795.

(a) Beginning on January 31, 2023, and on May 1, August 1, and December 1 annually thereafter, the commission shall issue a written report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee detailing the actions undertaken by the commission in the period since the previous report pursuant to this chapter through that date, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Amount of funds expended.

(2) Purpose of funds expended.

(3) Status of actions funded.

(4) For new and expanded resources, the amount by megawatt, resource type, operational date, and expected lifetime of
 that capacity.

(5) The frequency at which resources funded by the Department of Water Resources or the commission have been used and the extent to which they complied with the requirements of this chapter.

(6) In consultation with the state board, an estimate or the best available information on the emissions of greenhouse gases, criteria air pollutants, and toxic air contaminants emitted by the resources funded by the Department of Water Resources or the commission over the period since the previous report.

(7) Summary of contracts, grants, and loans issued pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Each report submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee at the same time and in the same manner as reports submitted
 pursuant to Section 80730 of the Water Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 3.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25795.5.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 6.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Accounts [25801. - 25806.]

25801.

There is in the General Fund in the State Treasury the Energy Resources Programs Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1067, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------

25802.

Each person who submits to the commission a notice of intent for any proposed generating facility shall accompany the notice with a fee of one cent ($0.01) per kilowatt of net electric capacity of the proposed generation facility. Such fee shall only be paid on one of the alternate proposed facility sites which has the highest electrical designed capacity. In no event shall such fee be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

For any other facility, the notice shall be accompanied by a fee of five thousand dollars ($5,000). Such fee shall only be paid on one of the alternate proposed facility sites.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25803.

All funds received by the commission pursuant to Section 25802, shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for deposit in the account. All funds in the account shall be expended for purposes of carrying out the provisions of this division, when appropriated by the Legislature in the Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

25804.

All references in this division or any other provision of law to the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Special Account shall be deemed references to the Energy Resources Programs Account.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1067, Sec. 4.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------

25806.

(a) A person who submits to the commission an application for certification under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 25500) or Chapter 6.2 (commencing with Section 25545) shall pay all costs incurred by the commission in processing the application and shall submit with the application a nonrefundable deposit of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000). For the actual costs incurred by the commission in excess of the deposit, the commission shall provide invoices, at least annually, to the applicant who shall timely remit the additional fees to the commission.

(b) A person who receives certification of a site and related facility pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 25500) or Chapter 6.2 (commencing with Section 25545) shall pay an annual fee of seventy thousand dollars ($70,000). For a facility certified on or after January 1, 2004, the first payment of the annual fee is due on the date the commission adopts the final decision. All subsequent payments are due by July 1 of each year that the facility retains its certification. The fiscal year for the annual fee is July 1 to June 30, inclusive.

(c) The deposit required pursuant to subdivision (a) and the fees described in subdivisions (b) and (e) shall be adjusted annually to reflect the percentage change in the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services, as published by the United States Department of Commerce.

(d) The Energy Facility License and Compliance Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. All fees received by the commission pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Treasurer for deposit into the fund. The moneys in the fund shall be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for processing applications for certification and for compliance monitoring.

(e) A person who submits to the commission a petition to amend an existing project that previously received certification shall submit with the petition a nonrefundable fee of five thousand dollars ($5,000). The commission shall conduct a full accounting of the actual cost of processing the petition to amend, for which the project owner shall reimburse the commission if the costs exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). Any reimbursement and fees received by the commission pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited into the Energy Facility License and Compliance Fund. This subdivision does not apply to a change in ownership or operational control of a project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 15, Sec. 7.   (SB 127)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Enforcement and Judicial Review [25900. - 25903.]

25900.

Except as provided in Sections 25402.11 and 25531, if the commission finds that any provision of this division is violated, or a violation is threatening to take place that constitutes an emergency requiring immediate action to protect the public health, welfare, or safety, the Attorney General, upon request of the commission, shall petition a court to enjoin the violation. The court may grant prohibitory or mandatory injunctive relief as warranted by way of temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, and permanent injunction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 591, Sec. 4.   (SB 454)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

25901.

(a) Within 30 days after the commission issues its determination on any matter specified in this division, except as provided in Section 25531, any aggrieved person may file with the superior court a petition for a writ of mandate for review thereof. Failure to file such an action does not preclude a person from challenging the reasonableness and validity of a decision in any judicial proceedings brought to enforce the decision or to obtain other civil remedies.

(b) The decision of the commission shall be sustained by the court unless the court finds (1) that the commission proceeded without, or in excess of its jurisdiction, (2) that, based exclusively upon a review of the record before the commission, the decision is not
 supported by substantial evidence in light of the whole record, or (3) that the commission failed to proceed in the manner required by law.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, subdivisions (f) and (g) of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure govern proceedings pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 33.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25902.

Any evaluations in the reports required by Section 25309 and any findings and determinations on the notice of intent pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 25500) shall not be construed as a final evaluation, finding, or determination by the commission and a court action may not be brought to review any such evaluation, finding, or determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1145, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

25903.

If any provision of subdivision (a) of Section 25531, with respect to judicial review of the decision on certification of a site and related facility, is held invalid, judicial review of such decisions shall be conducted in the superior court subject to the conditions of subdivision (b) of Section 25531. The superior court shall grant priority in setting such matters for review, and the appeals from any such review shall be given preference in hearings in the Supreme Court and courts of appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10.5. Insulation Material Standards [25910. - 25912.]

25910.

The commission shall, by regulation adopted no later than July 1, 1978, establish minimum standards for the amount of additional insulation (expressed in terms of R-value) installed in existing buildings. One year after the adoption of those standards, no insulation shall be installed in any existing building by a contractor unless the contractor certifies to the customer in writing that the amount of insulation (expressed in terms of R-value) meets or exceeds the minimum amount established by the standards. The minimum standards may vary for different types of buildings or building occupancies and different climate zones in the state. The minimum standards shall be economically feasible in that the resultant savings in energy procurement costs shall be greater than the cost of the insulation to the customer amortized over the useful life of the insulation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1456, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

25911.

The State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission may adopt regulations pertaining to urea formaldehyde foam insulation materials as are reasonably necessary to protect the public health and safety. These regulations may include, but are not limited to, prohibition of the manufacture, sale, or installation of urea formaldehyde foam insulation, requirements for safety notices to consumers, certification of installers, and specification of installation practices. Regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be promulgated after public hearings in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Any regulation adopted by the commission to prohibit the sale and installation of urea formaldehyde foam insulation shall be based upon a record of scientific evidence which demonstrates the need for the prohibition in order to protect the public health and safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1456, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

25912.

Prior to adopting any regulation which causes a prohibition on the sale and installation of urea formaldehyde foam insulation, the commission shall consult with, and solicit written comments from, all of the following:

(a) Federal and state agencies with appropriate scientific staffs, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Health Services, the National Academy of Sciences, the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, the United States Department of Energy, and the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission.

(b) Universities and public and private scientific organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1456, Sec. 18.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10.8. Home Energy and Labeling Program [25942. - 25943.]

25942.

(a) On or before July 1, 1995, the commission shall establish criteria for adopting a statewide home energy rating program for residential dwellings. The program criteria shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following elements:

(1) Consistent, accurate, and uniform ratings based on a single statewide rating scale.

(2) Reasonable estimates of potential utility bill savings, and reliable recommendations on cost-effective measures to improve energy efficiency.

(3) Training and certification procedures for home raters and quality assurance procedures to promote accurate ratings and to protect consumers.

(4) In coordination with home energy rating service organization data bases, procedures to establish a centralized, publicly accessible, data base that includes a uniform reporting system for information on residential dwellings, excluding proprietary information, needed to facilitate the program. There shall be no public access to information in the data base concerning specific dwellings without the owner’s or occupant’s permission.

(5) Labeling procedures that will meet the needs of home buyers, homeowners, renters, the real estate industry, and mortgage lenders with an interest in home energy ratings.

(b) The commission shall adopt the program pursuant to subdivision (a) in consultation with representatives of the Department of Real Estate, the Department of Housing and Community Development, the Public Utilities Commission, investor-owned and municipal utilities, cities and counties, real estate licensees, home builders, mortgage lenders, home appraisers and inspectors, home energy rating organizations, contractors who provide home energy services, consumer groups, and environmental groups.

(c) On and after January 1, 1996, no home energy rating services may be performed in this state unless the services have been certified, if such a certification program is available, by the commission to be in compliance with the program criteria specified in subdivision (a) and, in addition, are in conformity with any other applicable element of the program.

(d) On or before July 1, 1996, the commission shall consult with the agencies and organizations described in subdivision (b), to facilitate a public information program to inform homeowners, rental property owners, renters, sellers, and others of the existence of the statewide home energy rating program adopted by the commission.

(e) Beginning with the 1998 biennial energy conservation report required by Section 25401.1, the commission shall, as part of that biennial report, report on the progress made to implement a statewide home energy rating program. The report shall include an evaluation of the energy savings attributable to the program, and a recommendation concerning which means and methods will be most efficient and cost-effective to induce home energy ratings for residential dwellings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 553, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

25943.

(a) (1) By March 1, 2010, the commission shall establish a regulatory proceeding to develop and implement a comprehensive program to achieve greater energy savings in California’s existing residential and nonresidential building stock. This program shall comprise a complementary portfolio of techniques, applications, and practices that will achieve greater energy efficiency in existing residential and nonresidential structures that fall significantly below the current standards in Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, as determined by the commission.

(2) The comprehensive program may include, but need not be limited to, a broad range of energy
 assessments, building benchmarking, energy rating, cost-effective energy efficiency
 improvements, public and private sector energy efficiency financing options, public outreach and education efforts, and green workforce training.

(3) The commission shall adopt, implement, and enforce a responsible contractor policy for use across all ratepayer-funded energy efficiency programs that involve installation or maintenance, or both installation and maintenance, by building contractors to ensure that retrofits meet high-quality performance standards and reduce energy savings lost or foregone due to poor-quality workmanship.

(4) The commission, in consultation with the Public Utilities Commission, shall establish consumer protection guidelines for energy efficiency products and services.

(b) To develop and implement the program specified in subdivision (a), the commission shall do both of the following:

(1) Coordinate with the Public Utilities Commission and consult with representatives from the Bureau of Real Estate, the Department of Housing and Community Development, investor-owned and publicly owned utilities, local governments, real estate licensees, commercial and homebuilders, commercial property owners, small businesses, mortgage lenders, financial institutions, home appraisers, inspectors, energy rating organizations, consumer groups, environmental and environmental justice groups, and other entities the commission deems appropriate.

(2) Hold at least three public hearings in geographically diverse locations throughout the state.

(c) In developing the requirements for the program specified in
 subdivision (a), the commission shall consider all of the following:

(1) The amount of annual and peak energy savings, greenhouse gas emission reductions, and projected customer utility bill savings that will accrue from the program.

(2) The most cost-effective means and reasonable timeframes to achieve the goals of the program.

(3) The various climatic zones within the state.

(4) An appropriate method to inform and educate the public about the need for, benefits of, and environmental impacts of, the comprehensive energy efficiency program.

(5) The most effective way to report the energy
 assessment results and the corresponding energy efficiency improvements to the owner of the residential or nonresidential building, including, among other things, the following:

(A) Prioritizing the identified energy efficiency improvements.

(B) The payback period or cost-effectiveness of each improvement identified.

(C) The various incentives, loans, grants, and rebates offered to finance the improvements.

(D) Available financing options including all of the following:

(i) Mortgages or sales agreement components.

(ii) On-bill
 financing.

(iii) Contractual property tax assessments.

(iv) Home warranties.

(6) Existing statutory and regulatory requirements to achieve energy efficiency savings and greenhouse gas emission reductions.

(7) A broad range of implementation approaches, including both utility and nonutility administration of energy efficiency programs, especially the use of not-for-profit and community-based organizations that assist with deployment in disadvantaged communities identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(8) Workforce development and job training for residents in disadvantaged
 communities, including veterans, at-risk youth, and members of the state and local community conservation corps.

(9) Any other considerations deemed appropriate by the commission.

(d) The program developed pursuant to this section shall do all of the following:

(1) Minimize the overall costs of establishing and implementing the comprehensive energy efficiency program requirements.

(2) Ensure, for residential buildings, that the energy efficiency
 assessments, ratings, or improvements do not unreasonably or unnecessarily affect the home purchasing process or the ability of individuals to rent housing. A transfer of property subject to the program implemented pursuant to this section shall not be invalidated solely because of the failure of a person to comply with a provision of the program.

(3) Ensure, for nonresidential buildings, that the energy improvements do not have an undue economic impact on California businesses.

(4) Determine, for residential buildings, the appropriateness of the Home Energy Rating System (HERS) program to support the goals of this section and whether there are a sufficient number of HERS-certified raters available to meet the program requirements.

(5) Determine, for nonresidential structures, the availability of an appropriate cost-effective energy efficiency assessment system and whether there are a sufficient number of certified raters or auditors available to meet the program requirements.

(6) Coordinate with the California Workforce Investment Board, the Employment Training Panel, the California Community Colleges, and other entities to ensure a qualified, well-trained workforce is available to implement the program requirements.

(7) Promote greater project penetration in disadvantaged communities identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, including the deployment of energy efficiency surveys and audits, energy efficiency retrofits and
 upgrades, weatherization, and followup project inspections by state-certified community conservation corps and other community-based workforce development organizations that serve residents of disadvantaged communities, including veterans and disadvantaged youth.

(8) Coordinate with, and avoid duplication of, existing proceedings of the Public Utilities Commission and programs administered by utilities.
